Illinois, session 104th, SB2660.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 18-185 and 18-190 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-185)7    Sec. 18-185. Short title; definitions. This Division 5 8may be cited as the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law. As 9used in this Division 5: 10    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 11All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 12States Department of Labor. 13    "Extension limitation" means (a) the lesser of 5% or the 14percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 1512-month calendar year preceding the levy year or (b) the rate 16of increase approved by voters under Section 18-205. 17    "Affected county" means a county of 3,000,000 or more 18inhabitants or a county contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or 19more inhabitants. 20    "Taxing district" has the same meaning provided in Section 211-150, except as otherwise provided in this Section. For the 221991 through 1994 levy years only, "taxing district" includes 23only each non-home rule taxing district having the majority of   SB2660- 2 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1its 1990 equalized assessed value within any county or 2counties contiguous to a county with 3,000,000 or more 3inhabitants. Beginning with the 1995 levy year, "taxing 4district" includes only each non-home rule taxing district 5subject to this Law before the 1995 levy year and each non-home 6rule taxing district not subject to this Law before the 1995 7levy year having the majority of its 1994 equalized assessed 8value in an affected county or counties. Beginning with the 9levy year in which this Law becomes applicable to a taxing 10district as provided in Section 18-213, "taxing district" also 11includes those taxing districts made subject to this Law as 12provided in Section 18-213. 13    "Aggregate extension" for taxing districts to which this 14Law applied before the 1995 levy year means the annual 15corporate extension for the taxing district and those special 16purpose extensions that are made annually for the taxing 17district, excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for 18the taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 19obligation bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made 20for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 21general obligation bonds issued before October 1, 1991; (c) 22made for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 23bonds issued to refund or continue to refund those bonds 24issued before October 1, 1991; (d) made for any taxing 25district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued to 26refund or continue to refund bonds issued after October 1,   SB2660- 3 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b11991 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 2district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 3before October 1, 1991 for payment of which a property tax levy 4or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 5pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 6principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 7governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 8other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 9payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 10lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 11issued by the commission before October 1, 1991, to pay for the 12building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 13contracts entered into before October 1, 1991; (h) made for 14payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 15Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 16construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (i) 17made for payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, 18as defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform 19Act, in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base 20less the amount in items (b), (c), (e), and (h) of this 21definition for non-referendum obligations, except obligations 22initially issued pursuant to referendum; (j) made for payments 23of principal and interest on bonds issued under Section 15 of 24the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made by a school 25district that participates in the Special Education District 26of Lake County, created by special education joint agreement   SB2660- 4 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1under Section 10-22.31 of the School Code, for payment of the 2school district's share of the amounts required to be 3contributed by the Special Education District of Lake County 4to the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund under Article 7 of 5the Illinois Pension Code; the amount of any extension under 6this item (k) shall be certified by the school district to the 7county clerk; (l) made to fund expenses of providing joint 8recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 9Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 10the Illinois Municipal Code; (m) made for temporary relocation 11loan repayment purposes pursuant to Sections 2-3.77 and 1217-2.2d of the School Code; (n) made for payment of principal 13and interest on any bonds issued under the authority of 14Section 17-2.2d of the School Code; (o) made for contributions 15to a firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 16Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 17under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 18(p) made for road purposes in the first year after a township 19assumes the rights, powers, duties, assets, property, 20liabilities, obligations, and responsibilities of a road 21district abolished under the provisions of Section 6-133 of 22the Illinois Highway Code; and (q) made under Section 4 of the 23Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or 24to supplement existing funds for community mental health 25facilities and services, including facilities and services for 26the person with a developmental disability or a substance use   SB2660- 5 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1disorder; and (r) (q) made for the payment of principal and 2interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 317-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 4those bonds. 5    "Aggregate extension" for the taxing districts to which 6this Law did not apply before the 1995 levy year (except taxing 7districts subject to this Law in accordance with Section 818-213) means the annual corporate extension for the taxing 9district and those special purpose extensions that are made 10annually for the taxing district, excluding special purpose 11extensions: (a) made for the taxing district to pay interest 12or principal on general obligation bonds that were approved by 13referendum; (b) made for any taxing district to pay interest 14or principal on general obligation bonds issued before March 151, 1995; (c) made for any taxing district to pay interest or 16principal on bonds issued to refund or continue to refund 17those bonds issued before March 1, 1995; (d) made for any 18taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 19to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 1, 201995 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 21district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 22before March 1, 1995 for payment of which a property tax levy 23or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 24pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 25principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 26governing body of the unit of local government finds that all   SB2660- 6 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 2payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 3lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 4issued by the commission before March 1, 1995 to pay for the 5building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 6contracts entered into before March 1, 1995; (h) made for 7payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 8Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 9construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (h-4) 10made for stormwater management purposes by the Metropolitan 11Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago under Section 12 12of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; (h-8) made 13for payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 14Section 9.6a of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 15Act to make contributions to the pension fund established 16under Article 13 of the Illinois Pension Code; (i) made for 17payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, as 18defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act, 19in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base less 20the amount in items (b), (c), and (e) of this definition for 21non-referendum obligations, except obligations initially 22issued pursuant to referendum and bonds described in 23subsections (h) and (h-8) of this definition; (j) made for 24payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 25Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made 26for payments of principal and interest on bonds authorized by   SB2660- 7 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 2Park District Act for aquarium or museum projects and bonds 3issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park District Act for 4the purpose of making contributions to the pension fund 5established under Article 12 of the Illinois Pension Code; (l) 6made for payments of principal and interest on bonds 7authorized by Public Act 87-1191 or 93-601 and (i) issued 8pursuant to Section 21.2 of the Cook County Forest Preserve 9District Act, (ii) issued under Section 42 of the Cook County 10Forest Preserve District Act for zoological park projects, or 11(iii) issued under Section 44.1 of the Cook County Forest 12Preserve District Act for botanical gardens projects; (m) made 13pursuant to Section 34-53.5 of the School Code, whether levied 14annually or not; (n) made to fund expenses of providing joint 15recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 16Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 17the Illinois Municipal Code; (o) made by the Chicago Park 18District for recreational programs for persons with 19disabilities under subsection (c) of Section 7.06 of the 20Chicago Park District Act; (p) made for contributions to a 21firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 22Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 23under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 24(q) made by Ford Heights School District 169 under Section 2517-9.02 of the School Code; (r) made for the purpose of making 26employer contributions to the Public School Teachers' Pension   SB2660- 8 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1and Retirement Fund of Chicago under Section 34-53 of the 2School Code; and (s) made under Section 4 of the Community 3Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or to 4supplement existing funds for community mental health 5facilities and services, including facilities and services for 6the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 7disorder; (t) and (s) made for the payment of principal and 8interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 917-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 10those bonds; and (u) made by a non-home rule municipality for 11mandatory contributions to a police pension fund created under 12Article 3 of the Illinois Pension Code or a firefighters' 13pension fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension 14Code, but only for the first year during which the levy is ever 15imposed by the non-home rule municipality; a levy described in 16item (u) shall be included in the non-home rule municipality's 17aggregate extension base in the following levy year and in 18each subsequent levy year after its first imposition. 19    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 20this Law applies in accordance with Section 18-213, except for 21those taxing districts subject to paragraph (2) of subsection 22(e) of Section 18-213, means the annual corporate extension 23for the taxing district and those special purpose extensions 24that are made annually for the taxing district, excluding 25special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing district 26to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds that   SB2660- 9 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1were approved by referendum; (b) made for any taxing district 2to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds 3issued before the date on which the referendum making this Law 4applicable to the taxing district is held; (c) made for any 5taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 6to refund or continue to refund those bonds issued before the 7date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 8taxing district is held; (d) made for any taxing district to 9pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 10continue to refund bonds issued after the date on which the 11referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 12is held if the bonds were approved by referendum after the date 13on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 14taxing district is held; (e) made for any taxing district to 15pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before the 16date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 17taxing district is held for payment of which a property tax 18levy or the full faith and credit of the unit of local 19government is pledged; however, a tax for the payment of 20interest or principal on those bonds shall be made only after 21the governing body of the unit of local government finds that 22all other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 23payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 24lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 25issued by the commission before the date on which the 26referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district   SB2660- 10 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1is held to pay for the building project; (g) made for payments 2due under installment contracts entered into before the date 3on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 4taxing district is held; (h) made for payments of principal 5and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 6Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 7the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 8(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 9obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 10referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 11bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 12Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 13interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 14the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 15airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 16installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 17before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 18a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 19fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 20persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 21District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 22Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 23fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 24the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 254-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made for the taxing 26district to pay interest or principal on general obligation   SB2660- 11 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1bonds issued pursuant to Section 19-3.10 of the School Code; 2and (n) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental Health Act 3to provide the necessary funds or to supplement existing funds 4for community mental health facilities and services, including 5facilities and services for the person with a developmental 6disability or a substance use disorder; and (o) (n) made for 7the payment of principal and interest on any bonds issued 8under the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to 9refund or continue to refund those bonds. 10    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 11this Law applies in accordance with paragraph (2) of 12subsection (e) of Section 18-213 means the annual corporate 13extension for the taxing district and those special purpose 14extensions that are made annually for the taxing district, 15excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing 16district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 17bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made for any 18taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 19obligation bonds issued before March 7, 1997 (the effective 20date of Public Act 89-718); (c) made for any taxing district to 21pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 22continue to refund those bonds issued before March 7, 1997 23(the effective date of Public Act 89-718); (d) made for any 24taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 25to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 7, 261997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) if the bonds   SB2660- 12 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1were approved by referendum after March 7, 1997 (the effective 2date of Public Act 89-718); (e) made for any taxing district to 3pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before March 47, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) for payment 5of which a property tax levy or the full faith and credit of 6the unit of local government is pledged; however, a tax for the 7payment of interest or principal on those bonds shall be made 8only after the governing body of the unit of local government 9finds that all other sources for payment are insufficient to 10make those payments; (f) made for payments under a building 11commission lease when the lease payments are for the 12retirement of bonds issued by the commission before March 7, 131997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) to pay for the 14building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 15contracts entered into before March 7, 1997 (the effective 16date of Public Act 89-718); (h) made for payments of principal 17and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 18Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 19the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 20(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 21obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 22referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 23bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 24Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 25interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 26the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing   SB2660- 13 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 2installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 3before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 4a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 5fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 6persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 7District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 8Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 9fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 10the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 114-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; and (m) made under Section 124 of the Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary 13funds or to supplement existing funds for community mental 14health facilities and services, including facilities and 15services for the person with a developmental disability or a 16substance use disorder; and (n) (m) made for the payment of 17principal and interest on any bonds issued under the authority 18of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue 19to refund those bonds. 20    "Debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 21that portion of the extension for a taxing district for the 221994 levy year, or for those taxing districts subject to this 23Law in accordance with Section 18-213, except for those 24subject to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 18-213, 25for the levy year in which the referendum making this Law 26applicable to the taxing district is held, or for those taxing   SB2660- 14 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1districts subject to this Law in accordance with paragraph (2) 2of subsection (e) of Section 18-213 for the 1996 levy year, 3constituting an extension for payment of principal and 4interest on bonds issued by the taxing district without 5referendum, but not including excluded non-referendum bonds. 6For park districts (i) that were first subject to this Law in 71991 or 1995 and (ii) whose extension for the 1994 levy year 8for the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by 9the park district without referendum (but not including 10excluded non-referendum bonds) was less than 51% of the amount 11for the 1991 levy year constituting an extension for payment 12of principal and interest on bonds issued by the park district 13without referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum 14bonds), "debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 15that portion of the extension for the 1991 levy year 16constituting an extension for payment of principal and 17interest on bonds issued by the park district without 18referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum bonds). 19A debt service extension base established or increased at any 20time pursuant to any provision of this Law, except Section 2118-212, shall be increased each year commencing with the later 22of (i) the 2009 levy year or (ii) the first levy year in which 23this Law becomes applicable to the taxing district, by the 24lesser of 5% or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price 25Index during the 12-month calendar year preceding the levy 26year. The debt service extension base may be established or   SB2660- 15 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1increased as provided under Section 18-212. "Excluded 2non-referendum bonds" means (i) bonds authorized by Public Act 388-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park 4District Act for aquarium and museum projects; (ii) bonds 5issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform 6Act; or (iii) refunding obligations issued to refund or to 7continue to refund obligations initially issued pursuant to 8referendum. 9    "Special purpose extensions" include, but are not limited 10to, extensions for levies made on an annual basis for 11unemployment and workers' compensation, self-insurance, 12contributions to pension plans, and extensions made pursuant 13to Section 6-601 of the Illinois Highway Code for a road 14district's permanent road fund whether levied annually or not. 15The extension for a special service area is not included in the 16aggregate extension. 17    "Aggregate extension base" means the taxing district's 18last preceding aggregate extension as adjusted under Sections 1918-135, 18-215, 18-230, 18-206, and 18-233. Beginning with 20levy year 2022, for taxing districts that are specified in 21Section 18-190.7, the taxing district's aggregate extension 22base shall be calculated as provided in Section 18-190.7. An 23adjustment under Section 18-135 shall be made for the 2007 24levy year and all subsequent levy years whenever one or more 25counties within which a taxing district is located (i) used 26estimated valuations or rates when extending taxes in the   SB2660- 16 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1taxing district for the last preceding levy year that resulted 2in the over or under extension of taxes, or (ii) increased or 3decreased the tax extension for the last preceding levy year 4as required by Section 18-135(c). Whenever an adjustment is 5required under Section 18-135, the aggregate extension base of 6the taxing district shall be equal to the amount that the 7aggregate extension of the taxing district would have been for 8the last preceding levy year if either or both (i) actual, 9rather than estimated, valuations or rates had been used to 10calculate the extension of taxes for the last levy year, or 11(ii) the tax extension for the last preceding levy year had not 12been adjusted as required by subsection (c) of Section 18-135.13    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 142012, the aggregate extension base for West Northfield School 15District No. 31 in Cook County shall be $12,654,592. 16    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 17purpose of calculating the limiting rate for levy year 2023, 18the last preceding aggregate extension base for Homewood 19School District No. 153 in Cook County shall be $19,535,377. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 212022, the aggregate extension base of a home equity assurance 22program that levied at least $1,000,000 in property taxes in 23levy year 2019 or 2020 under the Home Equity Assurance Act 24shall be the amount that the program's aggregate extension 25base for levy year 2021 would have been if the program had 26levied a property tax for levy year 2021.   SB2660- 17 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1    "Levy year" has the same meaning as "year" under Section 21-155. 3    "New property" means (i) the assessed value, after final 4board of review or board of appeals action, of new 5improvements or additions to existing improvements on any 6parcel of real property that increase the assessed value of 7that real property during the levy year multiplied by the 8equalization factor issued by the Department under Section 917-30, (ii) the assessed value, after final board of review or 10board of appeals action, of real property not exempt from real 11estate taxation, which real property was exempt from real 12estate taxation for any portion of the immediately preceding 13levy year, multiplied by the equalization factor issued by the 14Department under Section 17-30, including the assessed value, 15upon final stabilization of occupancy after new construction 16is complete, of any real property located within the 17boundaries of an otherwise or previously exempt military 18reservation that is intended for residential use and owned by 19or leased to a private corporation or other entity, (iii) in 20counties that classify in accordance with Section 4 of Article 21IX of the Illinois Constitution, an incentive property's 22additional assessed value resulting from a scheduled increase 23in the level of assessment as applied to the first year final 24board of review market value, and (iv) any increase in 25assessed value due to oil or gas production from an oil or gas 26well required to be permitted under the Hydraulic Fracturing   SB2660- 18 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1Regulatory Act that was not produced in or accounted for 2during the previous levy year. In addition, the county clerk 3in a county containing a population of 3,000,000 or more shall 4include in the 1997 recovered tax increment value for any 5school district, any recovered tax increment value that was 6applicable to the 1995 tax year calculations. 7    "Qualified airport authority" means an airport authority 8organized under the Airport Authorities Act and located in a 9county bordering on the State of Wisconsin and having a 10population in excess of 200,000 and not greater than 500,000. 11    "Recovered tax increment value" means, except as otherwise 12provided in this paragraph, the amount of the current year's 13equalized assessed value, in the first year after a 14municipality terminates the designation of an area as a 15redevelopment project area previously established under the 16Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois 17Municipal Code, previously established under the Industrial 18Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously 19established under the Economic Development Project Area Tax 20Increment Act of 1995, or previously established under the 21Economic Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, of 22each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in 23the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 24equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 25project area. For the taxes which are extended for the 1997 26levy year, the recovered tax increment value for a non-home   SB2660- 19 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1rule taxing district that first became subject to this Law for 2the 1995 levy year because a majority of its 1994 equalized 3assessed value was in an affected county or counties shall be 4increased if a municipality terminated the designation of an 5area in 1993 as a redevelopment project area previously 6established under the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment 7Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously established 8under the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois 9Municipal Code, or previously established under the Economic 10Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, by an amount 11equal to the 1994 equalized assessed value of each taxable 12lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in the 13redevelopment project area over and above the initial 14equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 15project area. In the first year after a municipality removes a 16taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property from a 17redevelopment project area established under the Tax Increment 18Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, 19the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal 20Code, or the Economic Development Area Tax Increment 21Allocation Act, "recovered tax increment value" means the 22amount of the current year's equalized assessed value of each 23taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property removed 24from the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 25equalized assessed value of that real property before removal 26from the redevelopment project area.   SB2660- 20 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, "limiting 2rate" means a fraction the numerator of which is the last 3preceding aggregate extension base times an amount equal to 4one plus the extension limitation defined in this Section and 5the denominator of which is the current year's equalized 6assessed value of all real property in the territory under the 7jurisdiction of the taxing district during the prior levy 8year. For those taxing districts that reduced their aggregate 9extension for the last preceding levy year, except for school 10districts that reduced their extension for educational 11purposes pursuant to Section 18-206, the highest aggregate 12extension in any of the last 3 preceding levy years shall be 13used for the purpose of computing the limiting rate. The 14denominator shall not include new property or the recovered 15tax increment value. If a new rate, a rate decrease, or a 16limiting rate increase has been approved at an election held 17after March 21, 2006, then (i) the otherwise applicable 18limiting rate shall be increased by the amount of the new rate 19or shall be reduced by the amount of the rate decrease, as the 20case may be, or (ii) in the case of a limiting rate increase, 21the limiting rate shall be equal to the rate set forth in the 22proposition approved by the voters for each of the years 23specified in the proposition, after which the limiting rate of 24the taxing district shall be calculated as otherwise provided. 25In the case of a taxing district that obtained referendum 26approval for an increased limiting rate on March 20, 2012, the   SB2660- 21 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1limiting rate for tax year 2012 shall be the rate that 2generates the approximate total amount of taxes extendable for 3that tax year, as set forth in the proposition approved by the 4voters; this rate shall be the final rate applied by the county 5clerk for the aggregate of all capped funds of the district for 6tax year 2012.7(Source: P.A. 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-311, eff. 8-6-21; 8102-519, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-707, eff. 94-22-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 10103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-587, eff. 5-28-24; 103-591, eff. 117-1-24; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; revised 7-9-24.) 12    (35 ILCS 200/18-190)13    Sec. 18-190. Direct referendum; new rate or increased 14limiting rate. 15    (a) If a new rate is authorized by statute to be imposed 16without referendum or is subject to a backdoor referendum, as 17defined in Section 28-2 of the Election Code, the governing 18body of the affected taxing district before levying the new 19rate shall submit the new rate to direct referendum under the 20provisions of this Section and of Article 28 of the Election 21Code. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the levies 22authorized by Sections 21-110 and 21-110.1 of the Illinois 23Pension Code shall not be considered new rates; however, 24nothing in Public Act 98-1088 this amendatory Act of the 98th 25General Assembly authorizes a taxing district to increase its   SB2660- 22 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1limiting rate or its aggregate extension without first 2obtaining referendum approval as provided in this Section. 3Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the levies 4authorized by Sections 3-125 and 4-118 of the Illinois Pension 5Code shall not be considered new rates. Notwithstanding any 6other provision of law, the levy authorized by Section 18-17 7is considered part of the annual corporate extension for the 8taxing district and is not considered a new rate. 9Notwithstanding the provisions, requirements, or limitations 10of any other law, any tax levied for the 2005 levy year and all 11subsequent levy years by any taxing district subject to this 12Law may be extended at a rate exceeding the rate established 13for that tax by referendum or statute, provided that the rate 14does not exceed the statutory ceiling above which the tax is 15not authorized to be further increased either by referendum or 16in any other manner. Notwithstanding the provisions, 17requirements, or limitations of any other law, all taxing 18districts subject to this Law shall follow the provisions of 19this Section whenever seeking referenda approval after March 2021, 2006 to (i) levy a new tax rate authorized by statute or 21(ii) increase the limiting rate applicable to the taxing 22district. All taxing districts subject to this Law are 23authorized to seek referendum approval of each proposition 24described and set forth in this Section.25    The proposition seeking to obtain referendum approval to 26levy a new tax rate as authorized in clause (i) shall be in   SB2660- 23 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1substantially the following form:2        Shall ... (insert legal name, number, if any, and 3    county or counties of taxing district and geographic or 4    other common name by which a school or community college 5    district is known and referred to), Illinois, be 6    authorized to levy a new tax for ... purposes and have an 7    additional tax of ...% of the equalized assessed value of 8    the taxable property therein extended for such purposes?9The votes must be recorded as "Yes" or "No".10    The proposition seeking to obtain referendum approval to 11increase the limiting rate as authorized in clause (ii) shall 12be in substantially the following form:13        Shall the limiting rate under the Property Tax 14    Extension Limitation Law for ... (insert legal name, 15    number, if any, and county or counties of taxing district 16    and geographic or other common name by which a school or 17    community college district is known and referred to), 18    Illinois, be increased by an additional amount equal to 19    ...% above the limiting rate for the purpose of...(insert 20    purpose) for levy year ... (insert the most recent levy 21    year for which the limiting rate of the taxing district is 22    known at the time the submission of the proposition is 23    initiated by the taxing district) and be equal to ...% of 24    the equalized assessed value of the taxable property 25    therein for levy year(s) (insert each levy year for which 26    the increase will be applicable, which years must be   SB2660- 24 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1    consecutive and may not exceed 4)?2    The votes must be recorded as "Yes" or "No".3    The ballot for any proposition submitted pursuant to this 4Section shall have printed thereon, but not as a part of the 5proposition submitted, only the following supplemental 6information (which shall be supplied to the election authority 7by the taxing district) in substantially the following form:8        (1) The approximate amount of taxes extendable at the 9    most recently extended limiting rate is $..., and the 10    approximate amount of taxes extendable if the proposition 11    is approved is $....12        (2) For the ... (insert the first levy year for which 13    the new rate or increased limiting rate will be 14    applicable) levy year the approximate amount of the 15    additional tax extendable against property containing a 16    single family residence and having a fair market value at 17    the time of the referendum of $100,000 is estimated to be 18    $....19        (3) Based upon an average annual percentage increase 20    (or decrease) in the market value of such property of %... 21    (insert percentage equal to the average annual percentage 22    increase or decrease for the prior 3 levy years, at the 23    time the submission of the proposition is initiated by the 24    taxing district, in the amount of (A) the equalized 25    assessed value of the taxable property in the taxing 26    district less (B) the new property included in the   SB2660- 25 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1    equalized assessed value), the approximate amount of the 2    additional tax extendable against such property for the 3    ... levy year is estimated to be $... and for the ... levy 4    year is estimated to be $ ....5        (4) If the proposition is approved, the aggregate 6    extension for ... (insert each levy year for which the 7    increase will apply) will be determined by the limiting 8    rate set forth in the proposition, rather than the 9    otherwise applicable limiting rate calculated under the 10    provisions of the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law 11    (commonly known as the Property Tax Cap Law).12The approximate amount of taxes extendable shown in paragraph 13(1) shall be computed upon the last known equalized assessed 14value of taxable property in the taxing district (at the time 15the submission of the proposition is initiated by the taxing 16district). Paragraph (3) shall be included only if the 17increased limiting rate will be applicable for more than one 18levy year and shall list each levy year for which the increased 19limiting rate will be applicable. The additional tax shown for 20each levy year shall be the approximate dollar amount of the 21increase over the amount of the most recently completed 22extension at the time the submission of the proposition is 23initiated by the taxing district. The approximate amount of 24the additional taxes extendable shown in paragraphs (2) and 25(3) shall be calculated by multiplying $100,000 (the fair 26market value of the property without regard to any property   SB2660- 26 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1tax exemptions) by (i) the percentage level of assessment 2prescribed for that property by statute, or by ordinance of 3the county board in counties that classify property for 4purposes of taxation in accordance with Section 4 of Article 5IX of the Illinois Constitution; (ii) the most recent final 6equalization factor certified to the county clerk by the 7Department of Revenue at the time the taxing district 8initiates the submission of the proposition to the electors; 9and (iii) either the new rate or the amount by which the 10limiting rate is to be increased. This amendatory Act of the 1197th General Assembly is intended to clarify the existing 12requirements of this Section, and shall not be construed to 13validate any prior non-compliant referendum language. 14Paragraph (4) shall be included if the proposition concerns a 15limiting rate increase but shall not be included if the 16proposition concerns a new rate. Any notice required to be 17published in connection with the submission of the proposition 18shall also contain this supplemental information and shall not 19contain any other supplemental information regarding the 20proposition. Any error, miscalculation, or inaccuracy in 21computing any amount set forth on the ballot and in the notice 22that is not deliberate shall not invalidate or affect the 23validity of any proposition approved. Notice of the referendum 24shall be published and posted as otherwise required by law, 25and the submission of the proposition shall be initiated as 26provided by law.  SB2660- 27 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1    If a majority of all ballots cast on the proposition are in 2favor of the proposition, the following provisions shall be 3applicable to the extension of taxes for the taxing district:4        (A) a new tax rate shall be first effective for the 5    levy year in which the new rate is approved;6        (B) if the proposition provides for a new tax rate, 7    the taxing district is authorized to levy a tax after the 8    canvass of the results of the referendum by the election 9    authority for the purposes for which the tax is 10    authorized;11        (C) a limiting rate increase shall be first effective 12    for the levy year in which the limiting rate increase is 13    approved, provided that the taxing district may elect to 14    have a limiting rate increase be effective for the levy 15    year prior to the levy year in which the limiting rate 16    increase is approved unless the extension of taxes for the 17    prior levy year occurs 30 days or less after the canvass of 18    the results of the referendum by the election authority in 19    any county in which the taxing district is located;20        (D) in order for the limiting rate increase to be 21    first effective for the levy year prior to the levy year of 22    the referendum, the taxing district must certify its 23    election to have the limiting rate increase be effective 24    for the prior levy year to the clerk of each county in 25    which the taxing district is located not more than 2 days 26    after the date the results of the referendum are canvassed   SB2660- 28 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1    by the election authority; and2        (E) if the proposition provides for a limiting rate 3    increase, the increase may be effective regardless of 4    whether the proposition is approved before or after the 5    taxing district adopts or files its levy for any levy 6    year. 7    Rates required to extend taxes on levies subject to a 8backdoor referendum in each year there is a levy are not new 9rates or rate increases under this Section if a levy has been 10made for the fund in one or more of the preceding 3 levy years. 11Changes made by this amendatory Act of 1997 to this Section in 12reference to rates required to extend taxes on levies subject 13to a backdoor referendum in each year there is a levy are 14declarative of existing law and not a new enactment. 15    (b) Whenever other applicable law authorizes a taxing 16district subject to the limitation with respect to its 17aggregate extension provided for in this Law to issue bonds or 18other obligations either without referendum or subject to 19backdoor referendum, the taxing district may elect for each 20separate bond issuance to submit the question of the issuance 21of the bonds or obligations directly to the voters of the 22taxing district, and if the referendum passes the taxing 23district is not required to comply with any backdoor 24referendum procedures or requirements set forth in the other 25applicable law. The direct referendum shall be initiated by 26ordinance or resolution of the governing body of the taxing   SB2660- 29 -LRB104 13562 HLH 26122 b1district, and the question shall be certified to the proper 2election authorities in accordance with the provisions of the 3Election Code.4(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.)